apertium-is-en.is.dix
    <pardef n="pokab/jörn__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>jörn</l>      <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jörninn</l>   <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jörn</l>      <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jörninn</l>   <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irni</l>      <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irninum</l>   <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jarnar</l>    <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jarnarins</l> <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irnir</l>     <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irnirnir</l>  <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irni</l>      <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>irnina</l>    <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jörnum</l>    <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jörnunum</l>  <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jarna</l>     <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jarnanna</l>  <r>jörn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sl/agur__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>agur</l>      <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agurinn</l>   <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ag</l>        <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aginn</l>     <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ag</l>        <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agnum</l>     <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ags</l>       <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agsins</l>    <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agir</l>      <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agirnir</l>   <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agi</l>       <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agina</l>     <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögum</l>      <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ögunum</l>    <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aga</l>       <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aganna</l>    <r>agur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/jölur__n_m">
      <e>       <p><l>jölur</l>     <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jölurinn</l>  <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jöl</l>       <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jölinn</l>    <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ili</l>       <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ilinum</l>    <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jalar</l>     <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jalarins</l>  <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ilir</l>      <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ilirnir</l>   <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ili</l>       <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ilina</l>     <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jölum</l>     <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jölunum</l>   <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jala</l>      <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jalanna</l>   <r>jölur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lögreglustöð__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>inni</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>var</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>varinnar</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>var</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>varnar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>var</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>varnar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>vum</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>vunum</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>va</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>vanna</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="skógarbjörn">     <i>skógarb</i><par n="pokab/jörn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pokabjörn">       <i>pokab</i><par n="pokab/jörn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="lögreglustöð">    <i>lögreglustöð</i><par n="lögreglustöð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="hvítabjörn">      <i>hvítab</i><par n="pokab/jörn__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="slagur">          <i>sl</i><par n="sl/agur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="upplýsingamiðstöð"><i>upplýsingamiðstöð</i><par n="lögreglustöð__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kjölur">          <i>k</i><par n="k/jölur__n_m"/></e>
